District of Columbia statutes.
31-2231.08

False statements and entries.

(a)

No person shall knowingly file with an insurance regulatory or other public official, knowingly make, publish, disseminate, circulate, or deliver to a person, or place before the public, or knowingly cause directly or indirectly to be made, published, disseminated, circulated, delivered to a person, or placed before the public, a false material statement of fact as to the financial condition of an insurer.

(b)

No person shall knowingly:

(1)

Make a false entry of a material fact in a book, report, or statement of an insurer;

(2)

With intent to deceive an agent of the Commissioner lawfully appointed to examine the insurer’s condition or any of its affairs, fail to make a true entry of any material fact pertaining to the business of an insurer in a book, report, or statement of the insurer; or

(3)

Make a false material statement to an insurance department official.

History

Apr. 3, 2001, D.C. Law 13-265, § 108, 48 DCR 1225